Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,119
Opportunity zone commission; powers and duties.

An opportunity zone commission shall advocate and recommend programs that encourage regional cooperation and foster community sustainability and economic development initiatives. The chairperson and vice-chairperson of a commission shall supervise the hiring of the executive director using the state personnel hiring process. The Department of Economic Development shall provide administrative and technical support to a commission. A commission may secure cooperation and assistance of and funding from other appropriate government and private-sector entities.

Laws 2005, LB 546, § 3.
December 31, 2010